Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB637.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Youth Summer Employment Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Eligible employer." An employer that meets the qualifications under section 4(c)."Fund." The Youth Summer Employment Fund established under section 6.1234567891011121314151617 "Grant." A grant awarded to an eligible employer under the program."Historically disadvantaged community." An area, municipality or part of a municipality where at least 20% of the population has been under the Federal Poverty Level as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for at least 30 years."Program." The Youth Summer Employment Grant Program established under section 3."Youth." An individual between 15 and 18 years of age who is a resident of this Commonwealth.Section 3. Youth Summer Employment Grant Program.The Youth Summer Employment Grant Program is established as a program within the department to award grants to eligible employers to develop summer youth employment opportunities.Section 4. Administration of program.(a) Administration.--The department shall administer the program.(b) Application.--An eligible employer shall submit an application, in a manner and form prescribed by the department, for a grant.(c) Eligible employers.--An employer, including for-profit companies, nonprofit organizations and municipalities, that meets the following qualifications:(1) Employs a youth employee for at least eight weeks during the summer between the spring school term and the fall school term.(2) Adheres to all applicable Federal and State child labor laws and other applicable labor laws.(3) Provides a work experience or an educational 20250HB0637PN0647 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 experience, or some combination of both.(4) Pays the youth employee a stipend or a salary that equals the rate of the minimum wage established by the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, or $15 per hour, whichever is greater.(5) Any other qualification that the department may deem as necessary to enforce or administer the program.(d) Regulations.--The department shall create guidelines and promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this act.(e) Advertisement.--The department shall create a publicly accessible Internet website that advertises the program to employers and annually send letters to schools of secondary education located in this Commonwealth to inform guidance counselors and other administrators of the available youth summer employment under this act.Section 5. Employment grants.(a) Grants.--The department shall award grants under the program to eligible employers who employ youths during the summer between the spring school term and the fall school term.(b) Grant amount.--The department shall award grants under the program as follows:(1) An eligible employer that employs between 10 and 20 youth employees shall receive a grant of $5,000.(2) An eligible employer that employs more than 20 youth employees shall receive a grant of $10,000.(3) If 50% of an eligible employer's youth employees live in a historically disadvantaged community, the eligible employer shall receive an additional grant of $5,000.Section 6. Youth Summer Employment Fund.20250HB0637PN0647 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Youth Summer Employment Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury.(b) Appropriation.--Money shall be appropriated to the department for the administration of the program and for grants provided under this act.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0637PN0647 - 4 - 1234567